Florida, session 2026, SB774.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSubsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection 16 (2) of section 112.1815, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 17 112.1815âFirefighters, paramedics, emergency medical 18 technicians, and law enforcement officers, and 911 public safety 19 telecommunicators; special provisions for employment-related 20 accidents and injuries.â 21 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 22 (a)ââ911 public safety telecommunicatorâ has the same 23 meaning as in s. 401.465(1). 24 (b)ââFirst responderâ as used in this section means a law 25 enforcement officer as defined in s. 943.10, a firefighter as 26 defined in s. 633.102, or an emergency medical technician or 27 paramedic as defined in s. 401.23 employed by state or local 28 government. A volunteer law enforcement officer, firefighter, or 29 emergency medical technician or paramedic engaged by the state 30 or a local government is also considered a first responder of 31 the state or local government for purposes of this section. 32 (2)(a)âFor the purpose of determining benefits under this 33 section relating to employment-related accidents and injuries of 34 first responders and 911 public safety telecommunicators, the 35 following shall apply: 36 1.âAn injury or disease caused by the exposure to a toxic 37 substance is not an injury by accident arising out of employment 38 unless there is a preponderance of the evidence establishing 39 that exposure to the specific substance involved, at the levels 40 to which the first responder was exposed, can cause the injury 41 or disease sustained by the employee. 42 2.âAny adverse result or complication caused by a smallpox 43 vaccination of a first responder is deemed to be an injury by 44 accident arising out of work performed in the course and scope 45 of employment. 46 3.âA mental or nervous injury involving a first responder 47 or a 911 public safety telecommunicator and occurring as a 48 manifestation of a compensable injury must be demonstrated by 49 clear and convincing evidence. For a mental or nervous injury 50 arising out of the employment unaccompanied by a physical injury 51 involving a first responder or a 911 public safety 52 telecommunicator, only medical benefits under s. 440.13 shall be 53 payable for the mental or nervous injury. However, payment of 54 indemnity as provided in s. 440.15 may not be made unless a 55 physical injury arising out of injury as a first responder 56 accompanies the mental or nervous injury. Benefits for a first 57 responder are not subject to any limitation on temporary 58 benefits under s. 440.093 or the 1-percent limitation on 59 permanent psychiatric impairment benefits under s. 440.15(3)(c). 60 Benefits for a 911 public safety telecommunicator are not 61 subject to any limitation on temporary benefits under s. 62 440.093. 63 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds and declares that this act 64 fulfills an important state interest. 65 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.